Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.360

Default.

The proceedings authorizing any revenue obligations under this chapter or any financing document securing the revenue bonds may provide that if there is a default in the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds or in the performance of any agreement contained in the proceedings or financing document, the payment and performance may be enforced by mandamus or by the appointment of a receiver in equity with power to collect revenues in accordance with the proceedings or provisions of the financing document.

[ 2007 c 36 s 9.]

NOTES:

Policy—Purpose—2007 c 36: See note following RCW 28B.07.300.